Washington statutes.
RCW 39.69.020

Loan agreements.

Any municipal corporation may enter into a loan agreement containing the terms and conditions of a loan from an agency of the state of Washington or the United States of America and evidencing the obligation of the municipal corporation to repay that loan under the terms and conditions set forth in the loan agreement. A loan agreement may provide that the municipal corporation will repay the loan solely from revenues set aside into a special fund for repayment of that loan. In the case of a municipal corporation authorized to borrow money payable from taxes, and authorized to levy such taxes, the loan agreement may provide that repayment of the loan is a general obligation of the municipal corporation, or both a general obligation and an obligation payable from revenues set aside into a special fund.

The state or federal agency making the loan shall have such rights of recovery in the event of default in payment or other breach of the loan agreement as may be provided in the loan agreement or otherwise by law.

[ 1987 c 19 s 2.]